Washington statutes.
RCW 15.88.025

Regulating wine grapes and wine—Existing comprehensive scheme—Applicable laws.

The history, economy, culture, and future of Washington state's agriculture involves the wine industry. In order to develop and promote wine grapes and wine as part of an existing comprehensive scheme to regulate those products the legislature declares:

(1) That it is vital to the continued economic well-being of the citizens of this state and their general welfare that its wine grapes and wine be properly promoted by (a) enabling the wine industry to help themselves in establishing orderly, fair, sound, efficient, and unhampered marketing of wine grapes and wines they produce; and (b) working to stabilize the wine industry by increasing markets for wine grapes and wine within the state, the nation, and internationally;

(2) That wine grape growers and wine producers operate within a regulatory environment that imposes burdens on them for the benefit of society and the citizens of the state and includes restrictions on marketing autonomy. Those restrictions may impair the wine grape growers' and wine producers' ability to compete in local, domestic, and foreign markets;

(3) That it is in the overriding public interest that support for the wine industry be clearly expressed; that adequate protection be given to agricultural commodities, uses, activities, and operations; and that wine grapes and wine be promoted individually, and as part of a comprehensive industry to:

(a) Enhance the reputation and image of Washington state's agriculture industry;

(b) Increase the sale and use of wine grapes and wine in local, domestic, and foreign markets;

(c) Protect the public by educating the public in reference to the quality, care, and methods used in the production of wine grapes and wine;

(d) Increase the knowledge of the qualities and value of Washington's wine grapes and wine; and

(e) Support and engage in programs or activities that benefit the production, handling, processing, marketing, and uses of wine grapes and wine;

(4) That this chapter is enacted in the exercise of the police powers of this state for the purpose of protecting the health, peace, safety, and general welfare of the people of this state; and

(5) That the production and marketing of wine grapes and wine is a highly regulated industry and that the provisions of this chapter and the rules adopted under it are only one aspect of the regulated industry. Other regulations and restraints applicable to the wine grape and wine industry include:

(a) Organic products act under chapter 15.86 RCW;

(b) Horticultural pests and diseases under chapter 15.08 RCW;

(c) Horticultural plants, Christmas trees, and facilities—Inspection and licensing under chapter 15.13 RCW;

(d) Planting stock under chapter 15.14 RCW;

(e) Washington pesticide control act under chapter 15.58 RCW;

(f) Food safety and security act under chapter 15.130 RCW;

(g) Insect pests and plant diseases under chapter 17.24 RCW;

(h) Wholesale distributors and suppliers of wine and malt beverages under chapter 19.126 RCW;

(i) Weights and measures under chapter 19.94 RCW;

(j) Title 66 RCW, alcoholic beverage control;

(k) Chapter 69.07 RCW, Washington food processing act;

(l) 27 U.S.C., Secs. 201 through 211, 213 through 219a, and 122A;

(m) 27 C.F.R., Parts 1, 6, 9, 10, 12, 16, 240, 251, 252; and

(n) Rules under Titles 16 and 314 WAC, and rules adopted under chapter 15.88 RCW.

[ 2018 c 236 s 708; 2011 c 103 s 30; 2002 c 313 s 110.]

NOTES:

Purpose—2011 c 103: See note following RCW 15.26.120.

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.